Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-155
Additional court cost; dispute resolution fee.

In addition to all other court costs assessed according to law, a dispute resolution fee of seventy-five cents shall be taxed as costs for each case filed in each county court and district court, including appeals to such courts, and for each appeal and original action filed in the Court of Appeals and the Supreme Court. The fees shall be remitted to the State Treasurer on forms prescribed by the State Treasurer within ten days after the end of each month. The State Treasurer shall credit the fees to the Dispute Resolution Cash Fund.

Laws 2003, LB 760, § 7.